New York, session 2025-2026, A2648.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 921-a of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. School districts, boards of cooperative educational services, coun- 4 ty vocational education and extension boards, charter schools, and non- 5 public elementary and secondary schools in this state shall be deemed 6 "public access epinephrine auto-injector device providers" as defined in 7 paragraph (d) of subdivision one of section three thousand-c of the 8 public health law and shall be subject to the requirements and limita- 9 tions of such section. 10 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 3000-c of the public health law is 11 amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 12 (d) "Public access epinephrine auto-injector device provider" means a 13 person, firm, organization or other entity possessing or operating an 14 epinephrine auto-injector device pursuant to this section. 15 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 3000-c of the public health law is 16 amended by adding a new paragraph (g) to read as follows: 17 (g) A public access epinephrine auto-injector device provider shall: 18 (i) cause an epinephrine auto-injector device to be maintained and 19 tested according to applicable standards of the manufacturer and any 20 appropriate government agency. 21 (ii) notify the regional council of the existence, location and type 22 of any epinephrine auto-injector device it possesses. 23 (iii) post a sign or notice at the main entrance to the facility or 24 building in which the epinephrine auto-injector device is stored, indi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05464-01-5 A. 2648 2 1 cating the location where any such epinephrine auto-injector device is 2 stored or maintained in such building or facility on a regular basis. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 4 have become a law.